Massachusetts, session 194th, S1715.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of Chapter 89 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the second paragraph and inserting in place the
following paragraph:-
At any intersection on ways, as defined in section 1 of chapter 90, in which vehicular
traffic is facing a steady red indication in a traffic control signal, the driver of a vehicle which is
stopped as close as practicable at the entrance to the crosswalk or the near side of the
intersections or, if none, then at the entrance to the intersection in obedience to such red or stop
signal shall not turn against a red or stop signal at any such intersection and a sign may be
erected at each intersection giving notice thereof. Any person who violates the provisions of this
paragraph shall be punished by a fine of not less than thirty-five dollars.
SECTION 2. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall issue guidance to the
division highways, cities and towns for the implementation and enforcement of this act.
of 1